Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 98.
ARKANSAS MEDICAL MARIJUANA AMENDMENT OF 2016.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical Acts 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 1 and 8, § 1, provided: “LEGISLATIVE INTENT.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, § 23, empowers the General Assembly to amend certain sections of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, so long as the amendments are germane to the section and consistent with its policy and purposes;

“(2)

Twenty-three (23) separate acts of the regular session of the Ninety-First General Assembly, Acts 2017, Nos. 4, 5, 438, 479, 544, 545, 587, 593, 594, 638, 639, 640, 641, 642, 670, 740, 948, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1098, 1099, and 1100, amended Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98;

“(3)
(A)

Twenty (20) of these twenty-three (23) acts were enacted independently of the other acts and do not reflect the language added by any of the other amendatory acts.

“(B)

However:

“(i)

Acts 2017, No. 438, § 1, was enacted as amended by Acts 2017, No. 5;

“(ii)

Acts 2017, No. 593, § 1, was enacted as amended by Acts 2017, No. 5; and

“(iii)

Acts 2017, No. 640, § 1, was enacted as amended by Acts 2017, No. 4;

“(4)

Thirteen (13) of the twenty-three (23) acts, Acts 2017, Nos. 4, 438, 479, 593, 639, 641, 670, 740, 948, 1023, 1024, 1098, and 1100, have conflicting provisions such as the same numbering for new subsections or subdivisions within the same section or subsection;

“(5)
(A)

Acts 2017, No. 1023, §§ 2 and 3, imposed additional requirements on both the Department of Health and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration regarding labeling and testing of usable marijuana to ensure that food or drink that has been combined with usable marijuana does not exceed ten milligrams (10 mg) of active tetrahydrocannabinol per portion.

“(B)

However, after further review, the additional requirements imposed on the Department of Health within Acts 2017, No. 1023, § 2, are unnecessary to achieve this purpose as the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration must also meet these requirements for dispensaries and cultivation facilities;

“(6)

Arkansas Code § 1-2-207, which addresses codification upon the passage of multiple acts amending the same subject matter, only references amendments to the Arkansas Code and uncodified acts and does not address the treatment of acts amending the Arkansas Constitution;

“(7)

The applicability of Arkansas Code § 1-2-303(d)(1), concerning nonsubstantive technical corrections to provisions of the Arkansas Code and acts of the General Assembly made under the direction of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, is equally uncertain;

“(8)

It is unclear whether the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may exercise its authority under Arkansas Code §§ 1-2-207 and 1-2-303 and make the customary technical corrections, such as changes to numbering and formatting, that are made by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to acts of the General Assembly that amend the same section of law; and

“(9)

Without technical corrections to the conflicting language in thirteen (13) of the twenty-three (23) amendatory acts of the 2017 regular session, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, will not read coherently and will be difficult to interpret, utilize, and cite.

“(b)

The intent of this act is to:

“(1)

Supersede certain provisions of Acts 2017, Nos. 4, 438, 479, 593, 639, 641, 670, 740, 948, 1023, 1024, 1098, and 1100, that conflict with or substantively duplicate the provisions of this act;

“(2)

Repeal Acts 2017, No. 1023, § 2, to ensure that the language incorporated within Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, is without conflicts; and

“(3)

Enact certain provisions of Acts 2017, Nos. 4, 438, 479, 593, 639, 641, 670, 740, 948, 1023, 1024, 1098, and 1100, in a format that integrates and incorporates certain provisions of the thirteen (13) acts by restating certain provisions in a coherent, cohesive, and comprehensive manner.

“(c)

This act does not modify or supersede:

“(1)

Any emergency clause, effective date clause, or retroactivity clause, of Acts 2017, Nos. 4, 438, 479, 593, 639, 641, 670, 740, 948, 1023, 1024, 1098, and 1100;

“(2)

Sections within Acts 2017, Nos. 4, 438, 479, 593, 639, 641, 670, 740, 948, 1023, 1024, 1098, and 1100, that are not within this act; or

“(3)

Acts 2017, Nos. 5, 544, 545, 587, 594, 638, 640, 642, 1022, and 1099.”

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 98, effective November 9, 2016, was proposed by initiative petition and adopted at the 2016 general election by a vote of 585,030 for and 516,525 against.

Amend. 98, § 1 added §§ 1—23 set out below.

Cross References.

Medical Marijuana, § 20-56-301 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 98, § 2: effective Nov. 9, 2016.

Acts 2017, No. 4, § 8, provided: “RETROACTIVITY. This act is retroactive to the effective date of the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016 [Nov. 9, 2016].”

Acts 2017, No. 4, §
9: Jan. 23, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the dates set for rulemaking within the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016 are impractical to encompass the magnitude of the medical marijuana program; that the Department of Health, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration, and the Medical Marijuana Commission need additional time to properly establish a medical marijuana program to fulfill the policies and purposes of the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016; and that this act is immediately necessary because the citizens of Arkansas need certainty about the law and rules creating the medical marijuana program before fully investing time, funds, personnel, and other resources into the development of dispensaries and cultivation facilities and because public participation in and transparency of the rulemaking process must be ensured. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 1098, § 3: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Medical Marijuana Commission will begin accepting applications for the licensing of cultivation facilities and dispensaries on July 1, 2017, which will begin the implementation of the use of medical marijuana in the state; that additional funding is needed to ensure that the implementation of the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016 is revenue neutral; and that this act is necessary because it is in the best interests of the state to increase Arkansas's ability to impose a special privilege tax on cultivation facilities and dispensaries to relieve the burden on the state of implementing the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2017, No. 1099, §
2: Apr. 7, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that public schools need additional guidance and clarity concerning the effect of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, also known as the ‘Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016’; that the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016 became effective on and after November 9, 2016; and that this act is immediately necessary because the public schools of the State of Arkansas need certainty about the law and rules concerning the use of medical marijuana by public school students. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 1 and 8, § 8: July 31, 2017. Emergency clause, provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that twenty-three (23) separate acts of the regular session of the Ninety-First General Assembly amended the Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, also known as the ‘Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016’; that this act is intended to avoid difficulties in interpreting, utilizing, and citing Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, in the wake of passage of Acts 2017, Nos. 4, 438, 479, 593, 639, 641, 670, 740, 948, 1023, 1024, 1098, and 1100; that this act enacts certain provisions of Acts 2017, Nos. 4, 438, 479, 593, 639, 641, 670, 740, 948, 1023, 1024, 1098, and 1100, in a format that integrates and incorporates the provisions of the thirteen (13) acts by restating certain provisions of the thirteen (13) acts in a coherent, cohesive, and comprehensive manner; and that to avoid confusion in the law, this act should become effective on the same date
as the majority of the thirteen (13) acts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 31, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 694, § 8: Apr. 4, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under current law the Arkansas Code Revision Commission does not have the authority to correct conflicts occurring when multiple acts amend the same provision of the Arkansas Constitution as expressly permitted by the Arkansas Constitution; that this inability to resolve conflicts makes the law unclear and impossible to publish for review and study by the citizens of the state; and that this act should become effective at the earliest opportunity so that it may be applied to acts enacted by the Ninety-Second General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 1004, § 2: Apr. 15, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is necessary to protect the individuals with developmental disabilities; that the current restriction on the location of a medical marijuana dispensary is in place for schools, churches, and daycare centers; and that this act is immediately necessary because the State of Arkansas needs to ensure the protection of the vulnerable citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

§
1. Short title.

This amendment shall be known and cited as the “Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016”.

§
2. Definitions.

As used in this amendment:

“Acquire” or “acquisition” means coming to possess marijuana by means of any legal source herein authorized, not from an unauthorized source, and in accordance with this amendment and any rules promulgated under this amendment;

“Assist” or “assisting” means helping a qualifying patient make medical use of marijuana by enabling the medical use by any means authorized under this amendment;

“Cardholder” means a qualifying patient, a dispensary agent, a cultivation facility agent, or a designated caregiver;

“Cultivation facility” means an entity that:

Has been licensed by the Medical Marijuana Commission under § 8 of this amendment; and

Cultivates, prepares, manufactures, processes, packages, sells to and delivers usable marijuana to a dispensary;

“Cultivation facility agent” means an employee, supervisor, or agent of a cultivation facility who:

Is twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

Works at the cultivation facility; and

Has registered with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division under § 9 of this amendment;

“Designated caregiver” means a person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age, has not been convicted of an excluded felony offense, has agreed to assist a physically disabled qualifying patient with the medical use of marijuana, and who has registered with the Department of Health under § 5 of this amendment.

“Designated caregiver” includes without limitation a parent:

Of a qualifying patient who is under the age of eighteen (18); and

Required to register as a designated caregiver under this amendment.

“Designated caregiver” shall not include a member of the Arkansas National Guard or the United States military;

“Dispensary” means an entity that has been licensed by the Medical Marijuana Commission under § 8 of this amendment;

“Dispensary agent” means:

An employee, supervisor, volunteer, or agent of a dispensary who:

Is twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

Works at the dispensary; and

Has registered with the division under § 9 of this amendment; and

An owner, officer, or board member of a dispensary who has registered with the division under § 8 of this amendment;

“Enclosed, locked facility” means a room, greenhouse, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other security devices that permit access only by an authorized individual;

“Excluded felony offense” means:

A felony offense as determined by the jurisdiction where the felony offense occurred.

The Medical Marijuana Commission, the Department of Health, or the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall determine whether an offense is a felony offense based upon a review of the relevant court records concerning the conviction for the offense.

An offense that has been sealed by a court or for which a pardon has been granted is not considered an excluded felony offense; or

A violation of a state or federal controlled-substance law that was classified as a felony in the jurisdiction where the person was convicted, but not including:

An offense for which the sentence, including any term of probation, incarceration, or supervised release, was completed ten (10) or more years earlier; or

An offense that has been sealed by a court or for which a pardon has been granted;

“Medical use” means the acquisition, possession, use, delivery, transfer, or transportation of marijuana or paraphernalia relating to the administration of marijuana to treat or alleviate a qualifying patient's qualifying medical condition or symptoms associated with the qualifying patient's qualifying medical condition;

“Physician” means a doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathic medicine who holds a valid, unrestricted, and existing license to practice in the state of Arkansas and has been issued a registration from the United States Drug Enforcement Administration to prescribe controlled substances;

“Qualifying medical condition” means one (1) or more of the following:

Cancer, glaucoma, positive status for human immunodeficiency virus/acquired immune deficiency syndrome, hepatitis C, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, Tourette's syndrome, Crohn's disease, ulcerative colitis, post-traumatic stress disorder, severe arthritis, fibromyalgia, Alzheimer's disease, or the treatment of these conditions;

A chronic or debilitating disease or medical condition or its treatment that produces one (1) or more of the following: cachexia or wasting syndrome; peripheral neuropathy; intractable pain, which is pain that has not responded to ordinary medications, treatment, or surgical measures for more than six (6) months; severe nausea; seizures, including without limitation those characteristic of epilepsy; or severe and persistent muscle spasms, including without limitation those characteristic of multiple sclerosis; and

Any other medical condition or its treatment approved by the Department of Health under § 4 of this amendment;

“Qualifying patient” means a person who has been diagnosed by a physician as having a qualifying medical condition and who has registered with the department under § 5 of this amendment.

“Qualifying patient” shall not include a member of the Arkansas National Guard or the United States military;

“Registry identification card” means a document issued by the department or the division that identifies a person as a qualifying patient, a dispensary agent, a cultivation facility agent, or a designated caregiver;

“Sealed” means to expunge, remove, sequester, and treat as confidential the record or records of a felony offense;

“Usable marijuana” means the stalks, seeds, roots, dried leaves, flowers, oils, vapors, waxes, and other portions of the marijuana plant and any mixture or preparation thereof.

“Usable marijuana” does not include the weight of any ingredients other than marijuana that are combined with marijuana and prepared for consumption as food or drink;

“Visiting qualifying patient” means a patient with a qualifying medical condition who is not a resident of Arkansas or who has been a resident of Arkansas for less than thirty (30) days and who is in actual possession of a registry identification card or its equivalent that is issued under the laws of another state, district, territory, commonwealth, or insular possession of the United States and pertains to a qualifying medical condition under this section;

“Written certification” means a document signed by a physician stating that in the physician's professional opinion, after having completed an assessment of the qualifying patient's medical history and current medical condition made in the course of a physician-patient relationship, the qualifying patient has a qualifying medical condition.

A written certification shall specify the qualifying patient's qualifying medical condition, which also shall be noted in the physician's records.

A physician shall not issue a written certificate to a patient based on an assessment performed through telemedicine.

A written certification is not a medical prescription;

“Current use of marijuana” means use of marijuana that justifies the good faith belief of an employer that an applicant or employee is engaging in the use of marijuana.

“Current use of marijuana” is presumed when a positive test result for marijuana occurs;

“Employee” means an individual employed by an employer, but does not include:

An individual employed by his or her parents, spouse, or child;

An individual participating in a specialized employment training program conducted by a nonprofit sheltered workshop or rehabilitation facility;

An individual employed outside the State of Arkansas; or

An independent contractor;

“Employer” means an entity that employs nine (9) or more employees in the State of Arkansas in twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year;

“Good faith belief” means reasonable reliance on a fact, or that which is held out to be factual, without intent to deceive or be deceived and without reckless or malicious disregard for the truth.

“Good faith belief” does not include a belief formed with gross negligence.

“Good faith belief” may be based on any of the following:

Observed conduct, behavior, or appearance;

Information reported by a person believed to be reliable, including without limitation a report by a person who witnessed the use or possession of marijuana or marijuana paraphernalia by an applicant or employee in the workplace;

Written, electronic, or verbal statements from the employee or other persons;

Lawful video surveillance;

A record of government agencies, law enforcement agencies, or courts;

A positive test result for marijuana;

A warning label, usage standard, or other printed material that accompany instructions for usable marijuana;

Information from a physician, medical review officer, or a dispensary;

Information from reputable reference sources in print or on the internet;

Other information reasonably believed to be reliable or accurate; or

Any combination of the items listed in subdivisions (23)(C)(i)-(x) of this section;

“Positive test result for marijuana” means a result that is at or above the cutoff concentration level established by the United States Department of Transportation or the Arkansas laws regarding being under the influence, whichever is lower;

“Safety sensitive position” means any position involving a safety sensitive function pursuant to federal regulations governing drug and alcohol testing adopted by the United States Department of Transportation or any other rules, guidelines, or regulations adopted by any other federal or state agency.

“Safety sensitive position” also means any position designated in writing by an employer as a safety sensitive position in which a person performing the position while under the influence of marijuana may constitute a threat to health or safety, including without limitation a position:

That requires any of the following activities:

Carrying a firearm;

Performing life-threatening procedures;

Working with confidential information or documents pertaining to criminal investigations; or

Working with hazardous or flammable materials, controlled substances, food, or medicine; or

In which a lapse of attention could result in injury, illness, or death, including without limitation a position that includes the operating, repairing, maintaining, or monitoring of heavy equipment, machinery, aircraft, motorized watercraft, or motor vehicles as part of the job duties; and

“Under the influence” means symptoms of the current use of marijuana that may negatively impact the performance of the job duties or tasks or constitute a threat to health or safety.

“Under the influence” includes without limitation:

Symptoms of the applicant's or employee's speech, walking, standing, physical dexterity, agility, coordination, actions, movement, demeanor, appearance, clothing, odor, or other irrational or unusual behavior that are inconsistent with the usual conduct of the applicant or employee;

Negligence or carelessness in operating equipment, machinery, or production or manufacturing processes;

Disregard for safety;

Involvement in an accident that results in:

Damage to equipment, machinery, or property;

Disruption of a production or manufacturing process; or

An injury; or

Other symptoms causing a reasonable suspicion that the current use of marijuana may negatively impact the performance of the job duties or tasks or constitute a threat to health or safety. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 5, § 1; 2017, No. 438, § 1; 2017, No. 479, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 544, § 1; 2017, No. 593, §§ 1, 2; 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 2; 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 2.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 4, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Transparency and participation by the public in the development of rules to implement the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016 requires sufficient time to publish rules, allow for comment by the public, and incorporate comments as appropriate;

“(2)

One hundred eighty (180) days from the effective date of the amendment is a reasonable amount of time to comply with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;

“(3)

The fiscal year for the State of Arkansas begins on July 1 of each year and ends on June 30 of each year;

“(4)

It is an unwise expenditure of public resources to enact the necessary appropriations, acts, and establish the necessary fiscal and regulatory provisions for a one-month period beginning on June 1, 2017; and

“(5)

The date of July 1, 2017, is a better effective date for the Medical Marijuana Commission to begin accepting applications.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 438, § 1, and Acts 2017, No. 593, § 1, specifically amended this section as amended by Acts 2017, No. 5.

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 5, in (19)(A), substituted “an” for “a full” preceding “assessment” and deleted “and the potential benefits of the medical use of marijuana would likely outweigh the health risks for the qualifying patient” from the end; and substituted “physician's records” for “qualifying patient's medical records” in (19)(B).

The 2017 amendment by No. 438 added (19)(C).

The 2017 amendment by No. 479 added (6)(C); redesignated former (14) as (14)(A); and added (14)(B).

The 2017 amendment by No. 544 rewrote (10)(A)(i); added (10)(A)(i)

(b)

; and deleted “However” at the beginning of in (10)(A)(ii).

The 2017 amendment by No. 593 added (19)(C) (now (19)(D)), and (20) through (26).

The 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 1 and 8 added (19)(C) and (19)(D).

§
3. Protections for the medical use of marijuana.

A qualifying patient or designated caregiver in actual possession of a registry identification card shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner or denied any right or privilege, including without limitation a civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or bureau, for the medical use of marijuana in accordance with this amendment if the qualifying patient or designated caregiver possesses not more than two and one-half ounces (2 ½ oz.) of usable marijuana.

A qualifying patient or designated caregiver is presumed to be lawfully engaged in the medical use of marijuana in accordance with this amendment if the qualifying patient or designated caregiver is in actual possession of a registry identification card and possesses an amount of usable marijuana that does not exceed the amount allowed under this amendment.

The presumption made in subdivision (b)(1) of this section may be rebutted by evidence that conduct related to marijuana was not for the purpose of treating or alleviating the qualifying patient's qualifying medical condition or symptoms associated with the qualifying medical condition in accordance with this amendment.

A qualifying patient or designated caregiver shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner or denied any right or privilege, including without limitation a civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or bureau, for giving, or offering to give, up to two and one-half ounces (2 ½ oz.) of usable marijuana to a qualifying patient or designated caregiver for the qualifying patient's medical use when nothing of value is transferred in return.

A designated caregiver is not prohibited from receiving compensation or reimbursement of expenses from a qualifying patient for assisting a qualifying patient with the medical use of marijuana.

A dispensary may:

Accept marijuana seedlings, plants, or usable marijuana from:

Cultivation facilities;

Other dispensaries in Arkansas; and

If permissible under federal law, out-of-state dispensaries;

Transfer or sell marijuana seedlings, plants, or usable marijuana to:

Cultivation facilities;

Other dispensaries in Arkansas; and

If permissible under federal law, out-of-state dispensaries; and

Accept marijuana seeds from any individual lawfully entitled to possess marijuana seeds, seedlings, or plants under the laws of the state in which the individual resides.

A school or landlord shall not refuse to enroll, refuse to lease to, or otherwise penalize an individual solely for his or her status as a qualifying patient or designated caregiver unless doing so would put the school or landlord in violation of federal law or regulations.

For the purposes of medical care, including without limitation organ transplants, a qualifying patient's authorized use of marijuana in accordance with this amendment is considered the equivalent of the authorized use of any other medication used at the direction of a physician and does not constitute the use of an illicit substance.

An employer shall not discriminate against an applicant or employee in hiring, termination, or any term or condition of employment, or otherwise penalize an applicant or employee, based upon the applicant's or employee's past or present status as a qualifying patient or designated caregiver.

A cause of action shall not be established against an employer based upon, and an employer is not prohibited from, any of the following actions:

Establishing and implementing a substance abuse or drug-free workplace policy that may include a drug testing program that complies with state or federal law and taking action with respect to an applicant or employee under the policy;

Acting on the employer's good faith belief that a qualifying patient:

Possessed, smoked, ingested, or otherwise engaged in the use of marijuana while on the premises of the employer or during the hours of employment; or

Was under the influence of marijuana while on the premises of the employer or during the hours of employment, provided that a positive test result for marijuana cannot provide the sole basis for the employer's good faith belief; or

Acting to exclude a qualifying patient from being employed in or performing a safety sensitive position based on the employer's good faith belief that the qualifying patient was engaged in the current use of marijuana.

The authorized or protected actions of an employer under this subdivision (f)(3) include without limitation:

Implementing, monitoring, or taking measures to assess, supervise, or control the job performance of an employee;

Reassigning an employee to a different position or job duties;

Placing an employee on paid or unpaid leave;

Suspending or terminating an employee;

Requiring an employee to successfully complete a substance abuse program before returning to work;

Refusing to hire an applicant; or

Any combination of the actions listed in subdivisions (f)(3)(C)(i) — (f)(3)(C)(vi) of this section.

Damages established for an employment discrimination claim based on an applicant's or employee's past or present status as a qualifying patient or designated caregiver in violation of this amendment shall be limited to the damages available for an employment discrimination claim under § 16-123-107(c) of the Arkansas Civil Rights Act of 1993, § 16-123-101 et seq., including the statutory limits provided under § 16-123-107(c)(2)(A)(i)-(v).

Liability for back pay shall not accrue from a date more than two (2) years prior to the filing of an action.

Damages under this subdivision (f)(3) shall not duplicate or increase an award for damages over the statutory limit allowed by state law or federal law existing on January 1, 2017, whichever is lower.

An action based on employment discrimination in violation of this subdivision (f)(3) shall be brought within one (1) year of the occurrence of the alleged discrimination.

An individual employee, agent of the employer, or employee of the agent of the employer is not liable for any violation of this subdivision (f)(3) that the employer is found to have committed.

This amendment does not waive the sovereign immunity of the State of Arkansas.

A person otherwise entitled to custody of, or visitation or parenting time with, a minor shall not be denied custody, visitation, or parenting time solely for conduct allowed under this amendment, nor shall there be:

A finding of abuse solely for conduct allowed under this amendment; or

A presumption of neglect or child endangerment for conduct allowed under this amendment.

A physician shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner or denied any right or privilege, including without limitation a civil penalty or disciplinary action by the Arkansas State Medical Board or by any other business, occupational, or professional licensing board or bureau, solely for providing a written certification.

Subdivision (g)(1) of this section does not prevent a professional licensing board from sanctioning a physician for failing to properly evaluate a patient's medical condition or for otherwise violating the applicable physician-patient standard of care.

A person shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner or denied any right or privilege, including without limitation a civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or bureau, for providing a qualifying patient or designated caregiver with marijuana paraphernalia for purposes of facilitating the qualifying patient's medical use of marijuana.

Any marijuana, marijuana paraphernalia, licit property, or interest in licit property, that is possessed, owned, or used exclusively in connection with the medical use of marijuana as allowed under this amendment, or property incidental to such use, shall not be seized or forfeited.

A person shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner or denied any right or privilege, including without limitation a civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or bureau, simply for being in the presence or vicinity of the medical use of marijuana as allowed under this amendment or for directly assisting a physically disabled qualifying patient with the medical use of marijuana.

A registry identification card or its equivalent that is issued under the laws of another state, district, territory, commonwealth, or insular possession of the United States that allows a visiting qualifying patient to possess or use marijuana for medical use in the jurisdiction of issuance has the same force and effect when held by a visiting qualifying patient as a registry identification card issued by the Department of Health if the same qualifying medical condition exists.

A visiting qualifying patient may obtain marijuana from a dispensary upon producing evidence of his or her registry identification card or its equivalent that is issued under the laws of another state, district, territory, commonwealth, or insular possession of the United States.

The department shall promulgate necessary rules concerning a visiting qualifying patient obtaining marijuana from a dispensary.

A pharmacist shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner or denied any right or privilege, including without limitation a civil penalty or disciplinary action by the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy or by any other business, occupational, or professional licensing board or bureau, solely for performing his or her duties as a pharmacist consultant for a registered dispensary. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 593, § 3; 2017, No. 1024, § 1.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 593 redesignated former (f)(3) as (f)(3)(A); substituted “applicant or employee” for “individual” and variations thereof in (f)(3)(A); and added (f)(3)(B) through (f)(3)(G).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1024 added (m).